Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,173
Terms,
defined.

For purposes of sections 60-4,173 to 60-4,179:

(1)
Driver training school or school means a business enterprise conducted by
an individual, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation
or a public or private educational facility which educates or trains persons
to operate or drive motor vehicles or which furnishes educational materials
to prepare an applicant for an examination by the state for an operator's
license, provisional operator's permit, or LPD-learner's or LPE-learner's
permit and which charges consideration or tuition for such service or materials;
and

(2) Instructor means any person who operates a driver training
school or who teaches, conducts classes, gives demonstrations, or supervises
practical training of persons learning to operate or drive motor vehicles
in connection with operation of a driver training school.

Laws
1967, c. 380, § 1, p. 1191;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409.06;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 123;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 384;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 19;

Laws 2008, LB279, § 1.